Washington statutes.
RCW 15.125.060

Deposit of fees into account within agricultural local fund—Revenue from fees—Appropriation not required for disbursement.

All fees collected under this chapter must be deposited in an account within the agricultural local fund. The revenue from the fees must be used solely for carrying out the provisions of this chapter, and no appropriation is required for disbursement from the fund.

[ 2017 c 317 s 23.]

NOTES:

Findings—Application—2017 c 317: See notes following RCW 69.50.325.